Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-413
Confinement and imprisonment other than in guardhouse.

Confinement and imprisonment other than in guardhouse, whether prior to, during or after trial by a military court, shall be executed in jails, penitentiaries or prisons designated by the Governor or by the Adjutant General for that purpose.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 13, p. 1557.